Utah statutes.
53A-8a-407.   Deficiencies -- Improvement.

(1)  The person responsible for administering an educator's evaluation shall give an educator whose performance is inadequate or in need of improvement a written document clearly identifying:

(a)  specific, measurable, and actionable deficiencies;

(b)  the available resources that will be provided for improvement; and

(c)  a recommended course of action that will improve the educator's performance.

(2)  An educator is responsible for improving performance, including using any resources identified by the school district, and demonstrating acceptable levels of improvement in the designated areas of deficiencies.

(3)  Subsections (1)(b), (1)(c), and (2) do not apply if the educator's unsatisfactory performance was documented for the same deficiency within the previous three years and a plan of assistance was implemented as provided in Section 53A-8a-503.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 425, 2012 General Session

